Maryland, session 2026, SB0534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–407.
(a) The Board of Community College Trustees for Frederick County consists of
seven members. Of the members:
(1) Each shall be a resident of Frederick County; and
(2) Each shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent
of the Senate, for a term of 5 years.
– 1 –

Ch. 577 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) A member of the Board of Community College Trustees may not serve
more than three consecutive 5–year terms.
(2) A member of the Frederick County Board of Education may not serve
on the Board of Community College Trustees.
(c) Each member of the Board is entitled to $500 a year for expenses.
(D) EACH MEETING OF THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR
PUBLIC COMMENT.
(E) (1) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE A VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDING OF EACH
MEETING OF THE BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE A RECORDING REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON THE BOARD’S
WEBSITE WITHOUT CHARGE AND, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, WITHIN 2
BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE RECORDING IS MADE.
(F) (1) THE BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN IN PERPETUITY A VIDEO OR AUDIO
RECORDING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY MINUTES
OF THE BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD MAY TRANSCRIBE A VIDEO RECORDING REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IF:
(I) THE VIDEO RECORDING HAS BEEN MAINTAINED FOR AT
LEAST 5 YEARS; AND
(II) THE TRANSCRIBED VIDEO RECORDING IS MAINTAINED IN
PERPETUITY.
(G) AS PART OF ONGOING TRAINING FOR BOARD MEMBERS AND AT LEAST
EVERY 2 YEARS, THE BOARD MEMBERS SHALL UNDERGO TRAINING SPECIFIC TO
BOARD GOVERNANCE, STRUCTURE, RESPONSIBILITIES, AND ROLES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –